Utah statutes.
78B-5-705.   Unsworn declaration in lieu of affidavit.

(1)  If the Utah Rules of Criminal Procedure, Civil Procedure, or Evidence require or permit a written declaration upon oath, an individual may, with like force and effect, provide an unsworn written declaration, subscribed and dated under penalty of this section, in substantially the following form:

"I declare (or certify, verify, or state) under criminal penalty of the State of Utah that the foregoing is true and correct.

Executed on (date).

(Signature)".

(2)  A person who knowingly makes a false written statement as provided under Subsection (1) is guilty of a class B misdemeanor.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 119, 2008 General Session

